Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 5

Three Stars of Tennessee Award

4-1-501. Three Stars of Tennessee Award — What constitutes — When presented — Selection and administration by homeland security council.

This part shall be known as the “Three Stars of Tennessee Award.”

The award shall consist of a plaque and a medal.

The governor or the governor's designee shall present a Three Stars of Tennessee Award to each recipient or surviving next of kin during a public ceremony held on, or as near as practicable to, September 11 of each year.

The Three Stars of Tennessee Award shall be selected and administered by the homeland security council created by Executive Order No. 8 of 2003, within the department of safety.

Acts 2014, ch. 950, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning recognition of peace officers, firefighters, and medical first responders who were either killed or suffered a career-ending injury in the line of duty, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 950.

4-1-502. Presentation to peace officers or next of kin — Submission of information to council — “Peace officer” defined.

A Three Stars of Tennessee Award shall be awarded to:

A peace officer who suffers a career-ending injury in the line of duty;

The surviving next of kin of a peace officer who is killed or sustains a fatal injury in the line of duty;

A federal law enforcement officer or special agent who suffers a career-ending injury in the line of duty assisting a state or local law enforcement agency; or

The surviving next of kin of a federal law enforcement officer or special agent who sustains a fatal injury while assisting a state or local law enforcement agency in this state.

Any person who has personal knowledge of a peace officer who was killed or suffered a career-ending injury in the line of duty, or a federal law enforcement officer or special agent who was killed or suffered a career-ending injury assisting a state or local law enforcement agency in this state, may submit that information in writing to the council.

As used in this section, “peace officer” means an officer, employee or agent of government who has a duty imposed by law to maintain public order; make arrests for offenses, whether that duty extends to all offenses or is limited to specific offenses including laws and regulations pertaining to the forests of this state; and to investigate the commission or suspected commission of offenses.

Acts 2014, ch. 950, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning recognition of peace officers, firefighters, and medical first responders who were either killed or suffered a career-ending injury in the line of duty, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 950.

4-1-503. Presentation to firefighters or next of kin — Submission of information to council — “Firefighter” defined.

A Three Stars of Tennessee Award shall be awarded to:

A firefighter who suffers a career-ending injury in the line of duty; or

The surviving next of kin of a firefighter who is killed or sustains a fatal injury in the line of duty.

Any person who has personal knowledge of a firefighter who, in the line of duty was killed or suffered a career-ending injury may submit that information in writing to the council.

As used in this section, “firefighter” means any full-time, part-time, or volunteer firefighter hired or accepted as a firefighter by a fire department recognized under the Fire Department Recognition Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 102, part 3 and meets the minimum training requirements of § 4-24-112.

Acts 2014, ch. 950, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning recognition of peace officers, firefighters, and medical first responders who were either killed or suffered a career-ending injury in the line of duty, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 950.

4-1-504. Presentation to medical first responders or next of kin — Submission of information to council — “Medical first responder” defined.

A Three Stars of Tennessee Award shall be awarded to:

A medical first responder who suffered a career-ending injury in the line of duty; or

The surviving next of kin of a medical first responder who is killed or sustains a fatal injury in the line of duty.

Any person who has personal knowledge of a medical first responder who was killed or suffered a career-ending injury in the line of duty may submit that information in writing to the council.

As used in this section, “medical first responder” means emergency services personnel or other person who responds to calls for emergency medical assistance from a 911 call.

Acts 2014, ch. 950, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning recognition of peace officers, firefighters, and medical first responders who were either killed or suffered a career-ending injury in the line of duty, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 950.